Vermont, session 2025-2026, S118.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Short Title * * *
Sec. 1. SHORT TITLE
This act may be cited as “The Food Security Act.”
* * * Seasonal Application of Manure * * *
Sec. 2. 6 V.S.A. § 4816 is amended to read:
§ 4816. SEASONAL APPLICATION OF MANURE
(a) Prohibition on application. A person shall not apply manure to land in
the State between December 15 and April 1 of any calendar year unless
authorized by this section.
(b) Extension of prohibition. The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and
Markets shall amend the Required Agricultural Practices by rule in order to
establish a process under which the Secretary may prohibit the application of
manure to land in the State between December 1 and December 15 and
between April 1 and April 30 of any calendar year when the Secretary
determines that due to weather conditions, soil conditions, or other limitations,
VT LEG #381461 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.118
2025 Page 3 of 21
application of manure to land would pose a significant potential of discharge or
runoff to State waters.
(c) Seasonal exemption. The Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets
shall amend the Required Agricultural Practices by rule in order to establish a
process under which the Secretary may authorize an exemption to the
prohibition on the application of manure to land in the State between
December 15 and April 1 of any calendar year or during any period established
under subsection (b) of this section when manure is prohibited from
application. Any process established for the issuance of an exemption under
the Required Agricultural Practices may authorize land application of manure
on a weekly, monthly, or seasonal basis or in authorized regions, areas, or
fields in the State, provided that any exemption shall:
(1) prohibit application of manure:
(A) in areas with established channels of concentrated stormwater
runoff to surface waters, including ditches and ravines;
(B) in nonharvested permanent vegetative buffers;
(C) in a nonfarmed wetland, as that term is defined in 10 V.S.A.
§ 902(5);
(D) within 50 feet of a potable water supply, as that term is defined in
10 V.S.A. § 1972(6);
(E) to fields exceeding tolerable soil loss; and
VT LEG #381461 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.118
2025 Page 4 of 21
(F) to saturated soils;
(2) establish requirements for the application of manure when frozen or
snow-covered soils prevent effective incorporation at the time of application;
(3) require manure to be applied according to a nutrient management
plan; and
(4) establish the maximum tons of manure that may be applied per acre
during any one application.
(d) Exemption for liquid manure injection. The prohibition on the
application of manure to land in the State under this section shall not apply to
the land application of liquid manure directly injected to soils, provided
manure is not applied:
(1) in areas with established channels of concentrated stormwater runoff
to surface waters, including ditches and ravines;
(2) in nonharvested permanent vegetative buffers;
(3) in a nonfarmed wetland, as that term is defined in 10 V.S.A.
§ 902(5);
(4) within 50 feet of a potable water supply, as that term is defined in 10
V.S.A. § 1972(6);
(5) to fields exceeding tolerable soil loss;
(6) to saturated soils; or
VT LEG #381461 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.118
2025 Page 5 of 21
(7) to snow covered soils, unless the application is approved by a
certified nutrient management technical service provider.
* * * Three-Acre Stormwater Permit; Agriculture * * *
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A § 1264 is amended to read:
§ 1264. STORMWATER MANAGEMENT
* * *
(b) Definitions. As used in this section:
* * *
(6) “Impervious surface” means those manmade surfaces, including
paved and unpaved roads, parking areas, roofs, driveways, and walkways, from
which precipitation runs off rather than infiltrates.
* * *
(10) “Regulated stormwater runoff” means precipitation, snowmelt, and
the material dissolved or suspended in precipitation and snowmelt that runs off
impervious surfaces and discharges into surface waters or into groundwater via
infiltration.
* * *
(14) “Stormwater runoff” means precipitation and snowmelt that does
not infiltrate into the soil, including material dissolved or suspended in it, but
does not include discharges from undisturbed natural terrain or wastes from
combined sewer overflows.
VT LEG #381461 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.118
2025 Page 6 of 21
* * *
(c) Prohibitions.
(1) A person shall not commence the construction or redevelopment of
one-half of an acre or more of impervious surface without first obtaining a
permit from the Secretary.
* * *
(7) In accordance with the schedule established under subdivision (g)(3)
of this section, a person shall not discharge stormwater from impervious
surface of three or more acres in size without first obtaining an individual
permit or coverage under a general permit issued under this section if the
discharge was never previously permitted or was permitted under an individual
permit or general permit that did not incorporate the requirements of the 2002
Stormwater Management Manual or any subsequently adopted Stormwater
Management Manual.
(d) Exemptions.
(1) No permit is required under this section for:
(A) Stormwater runoff from farms in compliance with the required
agricultural practices adopted by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and
Markets, provided that this exemption shall not apply to construction
stormwater permits required by subdivision (c)(4) of this section. This
VT LEG #381461 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.118
2025 Page 7 of 21
exemption shall apply to any farm subject to the permit requirement under
subdivision (c)(7) of this section.
(B) Stormwater runoff from concentrated animal feeding operations
permitted under subsection 1263(g) of this chapter.
(C) Stormwater runoff from accepted silvicultural practices, as
defined by the Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation, including
practices that are in compliance with the Acceptable Management Practices for
Maintaining Water Quality on Logging Jobs in Vermont, as adopted by the
Commissioner of Forests, Parks and Recreation.
(D) Stormwater runoff permitted under section 1263 of this title.
(2) No permit is required under subdivision (c)(1), (5), or (7) of this
section and for which a municipality has assumed full legal responsibility as
part of a permit issued to the municipality by the Secretary. As used in this
subdivision, “full legal responsibility” means legal control of the stormwater
system, including a legal right to access the stormwater system, a legal duty to
properly maintain the stormwater system, and a legal duty to repair and replace
the stormwater system when it no longer adequately protects waters of the
State.
* * *
* * * Right to Farm * * *
VT LEG #381461 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.118
2025 Page 8 of 21
Sec. 4. 12 V.S.A. chapter 195 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 195. NUISANCE SUITS AGAINST AGRICULTURAL
ACTIVITIES
§ 5751. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND PURPOSE
The General Assembly finds that agricultural production is a major
contributor to the State’s economy; that agricultural lands constitute unique
and irreplaceable resources of statewide importance; that the continuation of
existing and the initiation of new agricultural activities preserve the landscape
and environmental resources of the State, contribute to the increase of tourism,
and further the economic welfare and self-sufficiency of the people of the
State; and that the encouragement, development, improvement, and
preservation of agriculture will result in a general benefit to the health and
welfare of the people of the State. In order for the agricultural industry to
survive in this State, farms will likely change, adopt new technologies, and
diversify into new products, which for some farms will mean increasing in
size. The General Assembly finds that agricultural activities are potentially
subject to lawsuits based on the theory of nuisance, and that these suits
encourage and could force the premature removal of the farmlands and other
farm resources from agricultural use. It is the purpose of this chapter to protect
reasonable agricultural activities conducted on the farm from nuisance
lawsuits.
VT LEG #381461 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.118
2025 Page 9 of 21
§ 5752. DEFINITIONS
For the purpose of As used in this chapter,:
(1) “agricultural Agricultural activity” means, but is not limited to:
(1)(A) the cultivation or other use of land for producing food, fiber,
Christmas trees, maple sap, or horticultural and orchard crops; the raising,
feeding, or management of domestic animals as defined in 6 V.S.A. § 1151 or
bees; the operation of greenhouses; the production of maple syrup; the on-site
storage, preparation, and sale of agricultural products principally produced on
the farm; and the on-site production of fuel or power from agricultural
products or wastes principally produced on the farm;
(2)(B) the preparation, tilling, fertilization, planting, protection,
irrigation, and harvesting of crops; the composting of material principally
produced by the farm or to be used at least in part on the farm; the ditching and
subsurface drainage of farm fields and the construction of farm ponds; the
handling of livestock wastes and by-products; and the on-site storage and
application of agricultural inputs, including lime, fertilizer, and pesticides;
(3)(C) “farming” as defined in 10 V.S.A. § 6001; and
(4)(D) “agricultural activities” as defined in 6 V.S.A. § 4802.
(2) “Generally accepted agricultural practices” mean:
(A) the requirements of 6 V.S.A. chapter 215, including permit
requirements or requirements of the Required Agricultural Practices;
VT LEG #381461 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.118
2025 Page 10 of 21
(B) the requirements of the Agency of Agriculture, Food and
Markets’ Vermont Rule for Control of Pesticides; and
(C) practices conducted in a manner consistent with proper and
accepted customs and standards followed by similar operators of agricultural
activities in the State.
§ 5753. AGRICULTURAL ACTIVITIES; PROTECTION FROM
NUISANCE LAWSUITS
(a)(1) Agricultural activities shall be entitled to a rebuttable presumption
that the activity does not constitute a nuisance if the agricultural activity meets
all of the following conditions:
(A) it is conducted in conformity with federal, State, and local laws
and regulations (including required agricultural practices);
(B) it is consistent with good agricultural practices;
(C) it is established prior to surrounding nonagricultural activities;
and
(D) it has not significantly changed since the commencement of the
prior surrounding nonagricultural activity.
(2) The presumption that the agricultural activity does not constitute a
nuisance may be rebutted by a showing that the activity has a substantial
adverse effect on health, safety, or welfare, or has a noxious and significant
interference with the use and enjoyment of the neighboring property No
VT LEG #381461 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.118
2025 Page 11 of 21
agricultural activity shall be or become a nuisance or trespass when the activity
is conducted in accordance with generally accepted agricultural practices.
(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the authority of State
or local boards of health to abate nuisances affecting the public health A
plaintiff alleging that an agricultural activity is a nuisance or trespass shall
have the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the
agricultural activity is not conducted in accordance with generally accepted
agricultural practices.
(c) The nuisance and trespass protection for an agricultural activity
provided for under subsection (a) of this section shall not apply whenever a
nuisance or trespass violation results from the negligent operation of an
agricultural activity.
§ 5754. LIBERAL CONSTRUCTION; SEVERABILITY
(a) This chapter is remedial in nature and shall be liberally construed to
effectuate its purposes.
(b) An agricultural activity shall not lose the nuisance or trespass protection
under section 5753 of this title due to:
(1) a change of ownership or a cessation of operation, in whole or in
part, of not more than 10 years;
(2) a change of crops produced; or
VT LEG #381461 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.118
2025 Page 12 of 21
(3) a change of a farming method or conversion of farming practices or
agricultural activities to other farming methods, practices, or agricultural
activities on a farm.
(c) If any provision of this chapter is held invalid, the invalidity does not
affect other provisions of this chapter that can be given effect without the
invalid provision, and for this purpose, the provisions of this chapter are
severable.
§ 5755. REQUIRED MEDIATION PRIOR TO SUIT
(a) A person shall not bring a court action based on a claim of nuisance or
trespass arising from an agricultural activity unless the person and the operator
of the agricultural activity, at least once, attempt to resolve through mediation
the issue or dispute that the person has concerning operation of the agricultural
activity. The mediation shall be conducted according to the provisions of the
Uniform Mediation Act set forth in chapter 194 of this title.
(b) The parties to the mediation may agree upon the use of a mediator to
assist in the resolution of the agreed upon issue or dispute, and the parties shall
share the cost of the mediator. If the parties to the mediation are unable to
resolve the relevant issue or dispute through mediation, the parties may agree
to submit the issue or dispute to binding arbitration pursuant to chapter 192 of
this title and shall share the cost of the arbitration.
VT LEG #381461 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.118
2025 Page 13 of 21
(c) A person bringing a court action based on a claim of nuisance or
trespass arising from an agricultural activity shall provide the court with a
sworn statement of an attempt to resolve the issue or dispute through
mediation.
* * *
* * * Municipal Land Use Regulation of Farming * * *
Sec. 5. 24 V.S.A. § 4413(d) is amended to read:
(d)(1) A bylaw under this chapter shall not regulate:
(A) required agricultural practices, including the construction of farm
structures, as those practices are defined by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food
and Markets;
(B) accepted silvicultural practices, as defined by the Commissioner
of Forests, Parks and Recreation, including practices that are in compliance
with the Acceptable Management Practices for Maintaining Water Quality on
Logging Jobs in Vermont, as adopted by the Commissioner of Forests, Parks
and Recreation; or
(C) forestry operations.
(2) As used in this section:
(A) “Farm structure” means a building, enclosure, or fence for farm
employee housing, housing livestock, raising horticultural or agronomic plants,
or carrying out other practices associated with accepted agricultural or farming
VT LEG #381461 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.118
2025 Page 14 of 21
practices, including a silo, as “farming” is defined in 10 V.S.A. § 6001(22), but
excludes a dwelling for human habitation.
(B) “Forestry operations” has the same meaning as in 10 V.S.A.
§ 2602.
(C) “Farm employee housing” means housing owned or controlled by
the farm employer, located on the farm premises and provided for the
occupancy of a farm employee and the farm employee’s family or household
members for no payment other than the farm employee’s labor. Payment of
utility and fuel charges paid by a farm employee does not affect the
designation of housing provided as a benefit of farm employment. Farm
employee housing shall meet the U.S. Department of Labor standards for
housing of H-2A temporary agricultural employees.
(D) “Farm employer” means a person earning at least one-half of the
person’s annual gross income from the business of farming as that term is
defined in Section 1.175-3 of the regulations issued by the U.S. Department of
the Treasury under the U.S. Internal Revenue Code, as amended.
(3) A person shall notify a municipality of the intent to build a farm
structure and shall abide by setbacks approved by the Secretary of Agriculture,
Food and Markets. No municipal permit for a farm structure shall be required.
(4) This subsection does not prevent an appropriate municipal panel,
when issuing a decision on an application for land development over which the
VT LEG #381461 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.118
2025 Page 15 of 21
panel otherwise has jurisdiction under this chapter, from imposing reasonable
conditions under subsection 4464(b) of this title to protect wildlife habitat;
threatened or endangered species; or other natural, historic, or scenic resources
and does not prevent the municipality from enforcing such conditions,
provided that the reasonable conditions do not restrict or regulate forestry
operations unrelated to land development.
(5) If a municipal bylaw or ordinance purports to regulate a practice
regulated under the required agricultural practices or to regulate a farm
structure, the owner or operator of a farm within the municipality may request
an opinion from the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets as to whether
the municipal bylaw violates this subsection. If the Secretary of Agriculture,
Food and Markets determines that the municipal bylaw or ordinance does
regulate a required agricultural practice or a farm structure, farms withing the
municipality shall not be required to comply with the municipal bylaw or
ordinance.
(6) When farm employee housing is unused by a farm employee, the
farm employer may rent the farm employee housing as a short-term rental
subject to the State laws for short-term rentals.
Sec. 6. 10 V.S.A. § 6081(t) is amended to read:
(t) No permit or permit amendment is required for the construction of
improvements for an accessory on-farm business for the storage or sale of
VT LEG #381461 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.118
2025 Page 16 of 21
qualifying products or the other eligible enumerated products as defined in
24 V.S.A. § 4412(11)(A)(i)(I). No permit or permit amendment is required for
the construction of improvements for an accessory on-farm business for the
preparation or processing of qualifying products as defined in 24 V.S.A.
§ 4412(11)(A)(i)(I), provided that more than 50 percent of the total annual
sales of the prepared or processed qualifying products that come from products
not produced on the farm where the business is located do not exceed
$250,000.00 in annual sales. No permit or permit amendment is required for
the construction of improvements for an accessory on-farm business for
educational, recreations, or social events that feature agriculture practices or
qualifying products, as those terms are defined in 24 V.S.A.
§ 4412(11)(A)(i)(II). This subsection shall not apply to the construction of
improvements related to hosting events or farm stays as part of an accessory
on-farm business as defined in 24 V.S.A. § 4412(11)(A)(i)(II).
* * * Use Value Appraisal * * *
Sec. 7. 32 V.S.A. § 3752(1) is amended to read:
(1) “Agricultural land” means any land, exclusive of any housesite, in
active use to grow hay or cultivated crops, pasture livestock, cultivate trees
bearing edible fruit, or produce an annual maple product, and that is 25 acres
or more in size, except as provided in this subdivision (1). Agricultural land
shall include buffer zones as defined and required in the Agency of
VT LEG #381461 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.118
2025 Page 17 of 21
Agriculture, Food and Markets’ Required Agricultural Practices rule adopted
under 6 V.S.A. chapter 215. There shall be a presumption that the land is used
for agricultural purposes if:
(A) it is owned by a farmer and is part of the overall farm unit;
(B) it is used by a farmer as part of the farmer’s operation under
written lease for at least three years; or
(C) it has produced an annual gross income from the sale of farm
crops or the equivalent value of donated farm crops in one of two, or three of
the five, calendar years preceding of at least:
(i) $2,000.00 for parcels of up to 25 acres; and.
(ii) $75.00 per acre for each acre over 25, with the total income
required not to exceed $5,000.00.
(iii) Exceptions to these income requirements may be made in
cases of orchard lands planted to fruit-producing trees, bushes, or vines that are
not yet of bearing age. As used in this section, the term “farm crops” also
includes animal fiber, cider, wine, and cheese, produced on the enrolled land or
on a housesite adjoining the enrolled land, from agricultural products grown on
the enrolled land.
* * * Vermont Income Tax * * *
VT LEG #381461 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.118
2025 Page 18 of 21
Sec. 8. 32 V.S.A. § 5811(21) is amended to read:
(21) “Taxable income” means, in the case of an individual, federal
adjusted gross income determined without regard to 26 U.S.C. § 168(k) and:
* * *
(B) decreased by the following items of income (to the extent such
income is included in federal adjusted gross income):
* * *
(ii) with respect to adjusted net capital gain income as defined in
26 U.S.C. § 1(h) reduced by the total amount of any qualified dividend
income: either the first $5,000.00 of such adjusted net capital gain income or
40 percent of adjusted net capital gain income from the sale of assets held by
the taxpayer for more than three years, except not adjusted net capital gain
income from:
(I) the sale of any real estate or portion of real estate used by
the taxpayer as a primary or nonprimary residence; or
(II) the sale of depreciable personal property other than farm
property and standing timber; or stocks or bonds publicly traded or traded on
an exchange, or any other financial instruments; regardless of whether sold by
an individual or business; and provided that the total amount of decrease under
this subdivision (21)(B)(ii) shall not exceed 40 percent of federal taxable
income or $350,000.00, whichever is less;
VT LEG #381461 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.118
2025 Page 19 of 21
* * *
(v) the amount of any federal deduction or credit that the taxpayer
would have been allowed for the cultivation, testing, processing, or sale of
cannabis or cannabis products as authorized under 7 V.S.A. chapter 33 or 37,
but for 26 U.S.C. § 280E; and
(vi) the amount of interest paid by a qualified resident taxpayer
during the taxable year on a qualified education loan for the costs of attendance
at an eligible educational institution; and
(vii) the amount of any net farm profit, provided the taxpayer’s net
farm profit during the taxable year did not exceed $10,000.00; and
(viii) notwithstanding subdivision (ii) of this subdivision (21)(B),
adjusted net capital gain income from the sale of real estate that is part of a
farming operation, provided:
(I) the buyer continued using the real estate as part of a farming
operation and is related to the seller by blood, marriage, civil union, or
adoption; or
(II) the buyer was an employee of the farming operation for a
minimum of 10 years prior to the sale; and
* * *
* * * Property Transfer Tax * * *
VT LEG #381461 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.118
2025 Page 20 of 21
Sec. 9. 32 V.S.A. § 9603 is amended to read:
§ 9603. EXEMPTIONS
The following transfers are exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter:
* * *
(5) Transfers between two spouses, or parent and child or child’s
spouse, or grandparent and grandchild or grandchild’s spouse, without actual
consideration therefor; and also transfers in trust or by decree of court to the
extent of the benefit to the donor or one or more of the related persons named
in this subdivision; and transfers from a trust named in this subdivision
conveying or releasing the property free of trust as between those related
persons and without actual consideration therefor.
* * *
(29) Transfers of property that is part of a farming operation, provided:
(A) the transferee will continue using the real estate as part of a
farming operation and is related to the seller by blood, marriage, civil union, or
adoption; or
(B) the transferee was an employee of the farming operation for a
minimum of 10 years prior to the transfer.
* * * Effective Dates * * *
VT LEG #381461 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.118
2025 Page 21 of 21
Sec. 10. EFFECTIVE DATES
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025, except that, notwithstanding 1
V.S.A. § 214, Sec. 8 (reductions to taxable income) shall take effect
retroactively on January 1, 2025 and shall apply to taxable years beginning on
and after January 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381461 v.1